Hawaii statutes.
§291-51.7
Reciprocity. The State,
counties, and private property owners shall recognize removable windshield
placards, temporary removable windshield placards, and special license plates
which have been issued by authorities of other states and countries, for the
purpose of identifying persons permitted to:

(1) Utilize
parking spaces reserved for persons with disabilities; or

(2) Exercise
other parking privileges afforded by the State, counties, or private property
owners for the benefit of persons with disabilities. [L 1992, c 46, pt
of §2; am L 1997, c 308, §8; am L 2001, c 297, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next